Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 3

Presidential Preference Primary and Convention Delegates

2-13-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Southern Regional Presidential Convention Delegate Act of 1986.”

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1341; Acts 1986, ch. 562, § 6.

Cross-References. Presidential preference primary, date of election, failure to have candidate's name on ballot, §2-13-205.

Presidential preference primary, printing of names on ballot, withdrawal of name, §2-5-205.

Collateral References.

Effect of irregularities or defects in primary petitions — State cases. 14 A.L.R.6th 543.

2-13-302. Election of delegates to national convention.

On the date established in §2-13-205 in 2004, and every four (4) years thereafter, an election will be held to elect delegates to the national conventions of all statewide political parties.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 2; 1977, ch. 316, § 4; T.C.A., § 2-1342; Acts 1986, ch. 562, § 7; 2003, ch. 374, § 3.

Cross-References. Presidential preference primary, date of election, §2-13-205.

2-13-303. Certification of delegates, alternates and delegates-at-large — Elections — Allocations — Apportionment of delegates according to primary votes.

On the date established in § 2-5-205(c) next preceding the election, the chair of each statewide political party will certify to the secretary of state and the coordinator of elections the number of delegates and alternates to the national convention allocated by the national party to be elected by the state party.

The chair of each statewide political party will further certify to the secretary of state and the coordinator of elections:

The number of delegates allocated to the state party by the national party to various congressional districts within Tennessee; and

The number of delegates-at-large allocated by the national party to the state party.

Delegates-at-large and alternates shall be elected in accordance with the rules of the respective parties.

If the party executive committee decides to elect the at-large delegates and alternates, it shall meet to do so after the second Tuesday in February and before the first Tuesday in March, such election to be by open ballot of the committee members and no secret balloting shall be permitted. Alternate delegates shall be elected proportional to the vote for delegates in the party's delegate election.

All state party allocations must be in accordance with the charter, rules, and bylaws of the respective national or state party.

There shall be at least three (3) delegates allocated to each congressional district unless such allocation violates the charter, bylaws or rules of the respective national political parties.

Where a political party has allocated three (3) delegates from each congressional district by national party rules, at least one third (1/3) of the at-large delegates shall be elected by popular vote on the ballot.

The respective party executive committees shall meet prior to the date established in § 2-5-205(c) to determine how the provisions of this section with respect to the division of delegates by district and at-large and the method of selecting at-large delegates, and the chair of each party shall certify the decisions of the executive committee to the secretary of state and the coordinator of elections.

In no case shall the candidate receiving the greatest number of votes in a primary have apportioned to such candidate a lesser number of delegates than the candidate with the next greatest number of votes. If one (1) candidate with a total number of votes statewide greater than other candidates receives fewer delegates from districts than the other candidates then the at-large delegates shall be so apportioned as to reflect the percentage of the vote received by the candidate with the greatest number of votes and that candidate's competitors.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 3; 1977, ch. 316, § 5; T.C.A., § 2-1343; Acts 1980, ch. 483, §§ 1-3; 1986, ch. 562, §§ 8-11; 1995, ch. 444, § 1; 2003, ch. 374, §§ 5, 6.

2-13-304. Placement of presidential candidates on preference primary ballot.

On the date established in § 2-5-205(a)(2), the secretary of state shall notify all nationally recognized candidates for president that their names are to be placed on the Tennessee presidential preference primary ballot. Such notice shall also be given at the same time to all of the statewide political parties.

Any person who is notified that such person's name is to be placed on such ballot and who does not desire their name to appear on such ballot shall execute and file with the secretary of state an affidavit stating without qualification that the person is not and does not intend to become a candidate for president in the forthcoming presidential election. Such person shall file such affidavit with the secretary of state prior to twelve o'clock (12:00) noon prevailing time established in § 2-5-205(b).

On the date established in § 2-5-205(c), after twelve o'clock (12:00) noon prevailing time, the secretary of state shall announce the candidates for president who shall appear on the ballot and shall issue a call for an election for the purpose of electing delegates to the national conventions of all statewide political parties.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 4; 1977, ch. 316, § 6; T.C.A., § 2-1344; Acts 1980, ch. 481, § 1; 1986, ch. 562, §§ 12-14; 1987, ch. 409, §§ 6-8; 2003, ch. 374, §§ 7-9.

2-13-305. Nominating petitions for delegates — Filing.

Candidates for election as delegates to the national convention of a political party shall qualify by filing nominating petitions no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon prevailing time on the date established in § 2-5-101(a)(2) which is prior to the presidential election year in the office of the secretary of state in Nashville.

Nominating petitions shall be signed by the candidate and twenty-five (25) or more registered voters who are eligible to vote to fill the position.

Nominating petitions shall bear the name and address of the candidate.

The sufficiency of such petitions, including the requisite quantity and authenticity of signatures, shall be verified by the county election commission.

If the candidate does not file by the deadline specified in this section, the candidate's name shall not be printed on the ballot.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 5; 1977, ch. 316, § 7; T.C.A., § 2-1345; Acts 1980, ch. 483, §§ 4, 7; 1986, ch. 562, § 15; 1989, ch. 58, § 1; 2003, ch. 374, § 10; 2008, ch. 618, § 2; 2015, ch. 20, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “twenty-five (25)” for “one hundred (100)” in (b)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 20, § 2. March 27, 2015.

2-13-306. Nominating petitions — Form.

Nominating petitions shall be in substantially the following form and the information thereon shall be verified by the county election commission:

We, the undersigned registered voters of the state of Tennessee and members of the (respective) party, hereby nominate (candidate's name), (address) of County, as a candidate for delegate to the national convention of the (respective) party to be voted in the presidential preference primary election to be held on the day of March. We request that the above nominee's name be printed on the official ballot as a candidate for delegate (at large) or (from the congressional district).

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 6; T.C.A., § 2-1346; Acts 1980, ch. 483, § 5; 1986, ch. 562, § 16; 2003, ch. 374, § 11; 2011, ch. 182, § 5.

2-13-307. Declaration of candidacy.

At the time of filing the nominating petition, the candidate for delegate to a national convention shall also file a declaration of candidacy which shall be in the following form:

I (candidate's name) declare that I reside in County and am a qualified and registered voter in that county. I further certify that I am a member of the (respective) party and am a candidate for election as a delegate (at large) or (from the congressional district) to the national convention of the (respective) party next to be held for the nomination of candidates of such party for president and vice president of the United States. I request that my name be printed as such candidate on the official ballot of the (respective) party in this election. I further declare that if elected as a delegate, I will attend such convention unless I shall be prevented by sickness or other occurrence over which I have no control.

If the delegate is supporting a particular presidential candidate, the declaration of candidacy shall also include the following:

I further declare that I am pledged to and a supporter of (name of candidate) and if elected as a delegate will cast my vote for (name of candidate) for at least two (2) ballots if that many ballots are taken.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 7; T.C.A., § 2-1347.

2-13-308. Indication of commitment.

At the time the declaration of candidacy is filed as provided by §2-13-307, a delegate-candidate shall indicate in writing to the secretary of state so that the ballot may so indicate, that the delegate-candidate is either:

An uncommitted delegate; or

Supporting a particular presidential candidate, and if so, which presidential candidate.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 8; T.C.A., § 2-1348.

2-13-309. Presidential candidate's consent.

In the event that the delegate-candidate is subject to the provisions of § 2-13-308(2), the delegate-candidate shall provide the secretary of state with the presidential candidate's written consent thereto no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon prevailing time at the time the nominating petition is filed.

In the event that such consent is not granted in writing by the presidential candidate, then the name of the delegate-candidate shall appear on the ballot as an uncommitted delegate-candidate.

Each presidential candidate must consent for each district to at least one (1) more and no more than twice the number of delegate-candidates being pledged to such candidate than the number of delegates allocated to the district.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 9; T.C.A., § 2-1349; Acts 1980, ch. 481, § 2; 1986, ch. 562, § 17.

2-13-310. Certified copies of nominating petition and declaration of delegate candidacy — Filing — Certification of names.

Certified copies of the original nominating petition and declaration of delegate candidacy shall be filed by the secretary of state with the coordinator of elections, with the chair of the state executive committee of the candidate's party, and with the chair of the state election commission.

The chair of the state election commission shall no later than four thirty p.m. (4:30 p.m.), prevailing time, on the date established in § 2-5-101(a)(2), certify to the chair of the appropriate county election commission the names of all delegate-candidates who have qualified to have their names printed on the ballot in that county.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 10; T.C.A., § 2-1350; Acts 1986, ch. 562, § 18; 2003, ch. 374, § 12.

2-13-311. Order of names on ballot.

The names of the candidates for president and delegate-candidate shall appear on the ballot as follows:

The names of the presidential candidates shall be listed vertically within the first three (3) columns for each respective party's primary election. The presidential candidates' names shall appear alphabetically according to the first initial of their surnames. Within the same columns for the presidential preference of each party, there shall be an “Uncommitted” designation immediately following the last listed presidential candidate's name within each party's primary;

Immediately following the names of the presidential candidates for each respective party's primary election as set forth in subdivision (1), the names of candidates for state, county, and municipal offices shall appear in the order outlined in § 2-5-208;

Following the names of the candidates for state, county, and municipal offices shall be the names of delegate-candidates and the name of the presidential candidate to whom the delegate-candidate is committed in accordance with §§ 2-13-307, 2-13-308(2), and 2-13-309(a). The names of the delegate-candidates shall appear vertically in alphabetical order according to their surnames. The “Uncommitted” designation shall appear with an alphabetical vertical listing of those uncommitted delegate-candidates pledged to the last listed presidential candidate;

It is expressly understood and provided that the appearance of presidential candidates' names as provided in this subdivision (3) is only for the purpose of identifying individual delegate-candidates committed to particular presidential candidates. The ballot shall clearly indicate that each voter is to vote individually for delegate-candidates;

In each congressional district, the ballot shall list only those delegate-candidates seeking election as a delegate from such congressional district and any at-large delegates who are to be placed on the ballot.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 11; T.C.A., § 2-1351; Acts 2017, ch. 1, § 1.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, substituted “delegate-candidate” for “delegate-candidates” in the introductory language; substituted “three (3)” for “two (2)” in (1); rewrote (2)(A), which read: “Within the vertical columns immediately following and below the entire presidential preference listing for that primary, the names of the presidential candidates shall again appear in vertical columns in alphabetical order according to their surnames. Immediately beneath each presidential candidate's name, the names of delegate-candidates who are committed to that particular presidential candidate in accordance with §§2-13-307,2-13-308(2), and2-13-309(a), shall appear vertically in alphabetical order according to their surnames. The “Uncommitted” designation shall appear with an alphabetical vertical listing of those uncommitted delegate-candidates pledged to the last listed presidential candidate.”; added designation (3)(A), added “Following the names of the candidates for state, county, and municipal offices shall be” at the beginning, substituted “and the name of the presidential candidate to whom the delegate-candidate is committed in accordance with §§2-13-307,2-13-308(2), and2-13-309(a).” for “the names of delegate-candidates who are committed to that particular presidential candidate in accordance with §§ 2-13-307, 2-13-308(2), and 2-13-309(a),”, and added “The names of the delegate candidates” at the beginning of the second sentence; substituted “subdivision (3)” for “subdivision (2)” in the first sentence in (3)(B); and redesignated former (3) as (4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 1, § 2. July 1, 2017.

2-13-312. Number of votes.

Each voter of the political parties shall cast one (1) vote for such voter's preference for candidate for president or for the uncommitted designation and shall vote for as many delegate-candidates as there are to be delegates from such congressional district.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 12; T.C.A., § 2-1352.

2-13-313. Allocation of elected delegates.

Delegates elected from a congressional district shall be allocated among the presidential candidates and the uncommitted designation as proportionally as is mathematically possible to the number of votes received in the presidential preference election within such congressional district. If the votes received by a presidential candidate in any congressional district are less than fifteen percent (15%) of the votes cast in such district, no delegates shall be allocated to such candidate and such votes of less than fifteen percent (15%) shall be considered as votes for the uncommitted designation.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 13; T.C.A., § 2-1353.

2-13-314. Allocation of delegates-at-large and alternates.

Delegates-at-large and alternates shall be allocated among the presidential candidates or an uncommitted designation so that the proportion of total delegates committed to any candidate shall equal, as mathematically as is possible, the proportion of the vote received by that candidate.

In no event shall the candidate receiving the greatest number of votes receive fewer district and at-large delegates than the candidate with the next greatest number of votes.

If the total votes received by a presidential candidate in the state at large is less than fifteen percent (15%) of the votes cast, no delegate-at-large or alternates shall be allocated to such candidate and such votes of less than fifteen percent (15%) shall be considered as votes for the uncommitted designation.

Votes for the uncommitted designation shall be considered in the same manner as votes for presidential candidates in the allocation of delegates.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 14; T.C.A., § 2-1354; Acts 1980, ch. 483, § 6.

2-13-315. Certification of political party's delegates.

The delegate-candidate, or delegate-candidates, according to the number allocated for any presidential candidate or for the uncommitted designation, receiving the highest number of votes shall be certified as that political party's delegate or delegates to the party's national convention.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 15; T.C.A., § 2-1355.

2-13-316. Vacancies in delegation.

Vacancies in the delegation to the national nominating convention of a political party shall be filled in accordance with the rules of the respective party.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 16; T.C.A., § 2-1356.

2-13-317. Binding effect of presidential primary.

The results of the preferential presidential primary shall be binding on the delegates to the national conventions as provided in this section. The delegates to the national conventions shall be bound by the results of the preferential presidential primary for the first two (2) ballots and shall vote for the candidate to whom they are pledged as provided in §2-13-307. The delegates shall thereafter be bound to support such candidate so long as the candidate, not to exceed two (2) ballots, has twenty percent (20%) of the total convention vote or until such time the candidate of their party releases them from the results of the presidential preference primary.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 17; T.C.A., § 2-1357.

2-13-318. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of this part that delegate selection comply with the delegate selection rules of the delegates' respective national or state party.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 18; T.C.A., § 2-1358; Acts 1995, ch. 444, § 2.

2-13-319. Conduct of elections.

The elections shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapters 1-19 of this title. Contested elections shall be determined in the manner provided for the determination of contested elections for primary candidates for statewide office.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 19; T.C.A., § 2-1359.

Collateral References.

Constitutionality of voter participation provisions for primary elections. 120 A.L.R.5th 125.

Effect of irregularities or defects in primary petitions — State cases. 14 A.L.R.6th 543.

2-13-320. Election to fill vacancies in county legislative body — Date.

All other laws notwithstanding, any county which shall have a special election to fill a county legislative body vacancy to correspond with the date of the presidential preference primary previously set forth in the former law may by resolution of the county legislative body schedule such election to correspond with the date of the preferential presidential primary set forth in this part.

Acts 1976, ch. 421, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 2-1360.